Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1247.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 805 of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, is amended to read:Section 805. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act where representatives of units of guards at prisons or mental hospitals [or], units of employes directly involved with and necessary to the functioning of the courts of this Commonwealth or units of peace officers, as defined under 18 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions), who are covered by this act have reached an impasse in collective bargaining and mediation as required in section 801 of this article has not resolved the dispute, the impasse shall be submitted to a panel of arbitrators whose decision shall be final and binding upon both parties with the proviso that the decisions of the arbitrators which would require legislative enactment to be effective shall be considered advisory only.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1247PN1562 - 2 - 123456789